Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.370

Authority to sell and distribute discover passes and day-use permits.

The department may, in coordination with the state parks and recreation commission, offer for sale and distribute discover passes and day-use permits, as provided in chapter 79A.80 RCW, at the department's drivers' licenses offices. Any amounts collected by the department through the sales of discover passes and day-use permits must be deposited in the recreation access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090.

[ 2012 c 261 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 261: See note following RCW 79A.80.010.